Florida, session 2026, HB365.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 320.021, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
320.021 Blue envelope program.—
(1) The department shall establish a blue envelope program
for the purpose of improving communication between individuals
with autism spectrum disorder and law enforcement officers
during motor vehicle-related interactions.
(2) By January 1, 2027, the department shall develop and
make available to individuals with autism spectrum disorder a
blue envelope that is intended to hold a copy of an individual's
driver license and his or her vehicle registration, proof of
insurance, and emergency contact information, which envelope may
be provided by the individual to a law enforcement officer
during a motor vehicle-related interaction. The exterior of the
blue envelope must identify the individual as an individual with
autism spectrum disorder and include communication guidelines
intended to assist law enforcement officers during interactions
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb365-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 365 2026
with drivers with autism spectrum disorder.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2027, an individual with autism
spectrum disorder may request a blue envelope from the
department or a tax collector's office.
Section 2. Section 943.1727, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
943.1727 Continued Employment training relating to autism
spectrum disorder.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Agency" means the ability to make independent
decisions and act in one's own best interests.
(b) "Autism spectrum disorder" has the same meaning as in
s. 627.6686(2).
(2) The commission department shall establish an a
continued employment training component relating to individuals
with autism spectrum disorder. Such training component must be
developed jointly by the commission and an organization that
advocates on behalf of, and offers training to law enforcement
officers in this state on interactions with, individuals with
autism spectrum disorder as defined in s. 627.6686. The training
component shall include, but need not be limited to, instruction
on the recognition of the symptoms and characteristics of an
individual on the autism disorder spectrum and appropriate
responses to an individual exhibiting such symptoms and
characteristics. Completion of the training component counts may
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb365-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 365 2026
count toward the 40 hours of instruction for continued
employment or appointment as a law enforcement officer required
under s. 943.135.
(3) The employment training component for law enforcement
officers which relates to interaction with individuals with
autism spectrum disorder must include in-person instruction for
initial certification and online or in-person instruction for
continued employment training or education required under s.
943.135(1) in all of the following:
(a) The nature and manifestation of autism spectrum
disorder.
(b) Techniques for interviewing or interrogating an
individual with autism spectrum disorder, including techniques
to ensure the legality of statements made by the individual and
techniques used to protect the rights of the individual.
(c) Techniques for locating an individual with autism
spectrum disorder who has run away and is in danger and for
returning that individual while causing as little stress as
possible to the individual.
(d) Techniques for recognizing the agency of an individual
with autism spectrum disorder while identifying potential
abusive or coercive situations.
(e) Techniques for de-escalating a potentially dangerous
situation to maximize the safety of both the officer and the
100 individual with autism spectrum disorder.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb365-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 365 2026
101 (f) Techniques for differentiating an individual with
102 autism spectrum disorder from an individual who is belligerent,
103 uncooperative, or otherwise displaying traits similar to the
104 characteristics of an individual with autism spectrum disorder
105 and for understanding the law as it relates to the use of the
106 Baker Act on an individual with autism spectrum disorder.
107 (g) The impact of an interaction with officers on
108 individuals with autism spectrum disorder.
109 (h) Information about the blue envelope program
110 established under s. 320.021 and the "SAFE" designation included
111 in the motor vehicle record pursuant to s. 320.02(15).
112 (4) All recruits must complete the employment training
113 component relating to individuals with autism spectrum disorder.
114 Such training component may be taught as part of other relevant
115 components of the training.
116 (5) The commission shall by rule require that each law
117 enforcement officer receive instruction in the techniques and
118 procedures described in subsection (3) as part of basic recruit
119 training and as part of the required instruction for continued
120 employment or appointment as such an officer.
121 (a) By July 1, 2028, each basic skills course required for
122 law enforcement officers to obtain initial certification, as
123 required under s. 943.13(9), must incorporate such training.
124 (b) By July 1, 2029, each law enforcement officer must
125 successfully complete such training, as required under s.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb365-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 365 2026
126 943.131(4)(a) and as part of continued training or education
127 required under s. 943.135(1).
128 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb365-00